New York, session 2025-2026, A3850.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "housing is a human right act". 3 § 2. Section 14 of the public housing law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 5 8. (a) The commissioner shall appoint an individual, otherwise known 6 as the New York state affordable housing czar, who shall create a 7 centralized office within the division of housing to advocate for and 8 oversee all of the state's housing initiatives, work with key stakehold- 9 ers, tenants, landlords, and developers to create an integrated state 10 housing plan to generate affordable and subsidized housing, ensure that 11 existing housing is utilized to prevent homelessness, and ensure state 12 residents have access to the state's growing number of affordable apart- 13 ments and homes. Responsibilities of the New York state affordable hous- 14 ing czar shall include, but not be limited to: 15 (i) making state residents aware of the range of affordable housing 16 opportunities; 17 (ii) creating, maintaining, and publicizing a central website where 18 state residents can apply for affordable housing units, or be directed 19 to where to apply for such units; 20 (iii) serving as an ombudsperson for individuals seeking public or 21 subsidized housing; 22 (iv) monitoring developer's compliance with state housing mandates; 23 (v) ensuring compliance with all state affordable housing mandates and 24 covenants; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05072-01-5 A. 3850 2 1 (vi) overseeing the development and implementation of a five-year 2 affordable housing compliance and management plan; and 3 (vii) ensuring state residents and community involvement in affordable 4 housing policy development. 5 (b) The New York state affordable housing czar shall create a volun- 6 teer task force, which shall consist of ten members, each of whom shall 7 serve a term of three years. Such members shall include the commission- 8 er, or such commissioner's designee, and the New York state affordable 9 housing czar. The remaining eight members shall be appointed as follows: 10 two members shall be appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 11 two members shall be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; two 12 members shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; and two 13 members shall be appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. No 14 later than one year after its formation, such volunteer task force shall 15 issue to the legislature a report containing its recommendations regard- 16 ing affordable housing in New York state. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 18 have become a law.